Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4114
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the DNA Identification Information Act.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 14;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 13.